Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5014.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5129. (1) An individual arrested and charged with violating section 448, 449, 449a, 450, 452, or 455 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.448, 750.449, 750.449a, 750.450, 750.452, and 750.455, or a local ordinance prohibiting prostitution commercial sexual activity or engaging or offering to engage the services of a prostitute person who provides or offers to provide commercial sexual activity may, upon order of the court, be examined or tested to determine whether the individual has sexually transmitted infection, hepatitis B infection, hepatitis C infection, HIV infection, or acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. Examination or test results that indicate the presence of sexually transmitted infection, hepatitis B infection, hepatitis C infection, HIV infection, or acquired immunodeficiency syndrome must be reported to the defendant and, pursuant to sections 5114 and 5114a, to the department and the appropriate local health department for partner notification. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if an individual is arrested and charged with violating section 145a, 338, 338a, 338b, 448, 449, 449a, 450, 452, 455, 520b, 520c, 520d, 520e, or 520g of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.145a, 750.338, 750.338a, 750.338b, 750.448, 750.449, 750.449a, 750.450, 750.452, 750.455, 750.520b, 750.520c, 750.520d, 750.520e, and 750.520g, or section 7404 by intravenously using a controlled substance, or a local ordinance prohibiting prostitution, commercial sexual activity, solicitation, gross indecency, or the intravenous use of a controlled substance, the judge or magistrate responsible for setting the individual's conditions of release pending trial shall distribute to the individual the information on sexually transmitted infection and HIV infection required to be distributed by county clerks under section 5119(1) and shall recommend that the individual obtain additional information and counseling at a local health department testing and counseling center regarding sexually transmitted infection, hepatitis B infection, hepatitis C infection, HIV infection, and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. Counseling under this subsection is voluntary on the part of the individual. (3) If a defendant is bound over to circuit court for violating section 145a, 338, 338a, 338b, 450, 452, 455, 520b, 520c, 520d, 520e, or 520g of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.145a, 750.338, 750.338a, 750.338b, 750.450, 750.452, 750.455, 750.520b, 750.520c, 750.520d, 750.520e, and 750.520g, and the district court determines there is reason to believe the violation involved sexual penetration or exposure to a body fluid of the defendant, the district court shall order the defendant to be examined or tested for sexually transmitted infection, hepatitis B infection, and hepatitis C infection and for the presence of HIV or an antibody to HIV. The circuit court shall order the examination or testing if the defendant is brought before it by way of indictment for any of the violations described in this subsection. If a defendant is bound over to or brought before the circuit court for violating section 520b, 520c, 520d, 520e, or 520g of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.520b, 750.520c, 750.520d, 750.520e, and 750.520g, the court shall, upon the victim's request, order the examination or testing to be done not later than 48 hours after the date that the information or indictment is presented and the defendant is in custody or has been served with the information or indictment. The court shall include in its order for expedited examination or testing at the victim's request under this subsection a provision that requires follow-up examination or testing that is considered medically appropriate based on the results of the initial examination or testing. Except as provided in subsection (5), (6), or (7), or as otherwise provided by law, the examinations and tests must be confidentially administered by a licensed physician, the department, or a local health department. The court also shall order the defendant to receive counseling regarding sexually transmitted infection, hepatitis B infection, hepatitis C infection, HIV infection, and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome, including, at a minimum, information regarding treatment, transmission, and protective measures. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, upon conviction of a defendant or the issuance by the probate court of an order adjudicating a child to be within the provisions of section 2(a)(1) of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.2, for violating section 145a, 338, 338a, 338b, 448, 449, 449a, 450, 452, 455, 520b, 520c, 520d, 520e, or 520g of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.145a, 750.338, 750.338a, 750.338b, 750.448, 750.449, 750.449a, 750.450, 750.452, 750.455, 750.520b, 750.520c, 750.520d, 750.520e, and 750.520g, or section 7404 by intravenously using a controlled substance, or a local ordinance prohibiting prostitution, commercial sexual activity, solicitation, gross indecency, or the intravenous use of a controlled substance, the court that has jurisdiction of the criminal prosecution or juvenile hearing shall order the defendant or child to be examined or tested for sexually transmitted infection, hepatitis B infection, and hepatitis C infection and for the presence of HIV or an antibody to HIV. Except as provided in subsection (5), (6), or (7), or as otherwise provided by law, the examinations and tests must be confidentially administered by a licensed physician, the department, or a local health department. The court also shall order the defendant or child to receive counseling regarding sexually transmitted infection, hepatitis B infection, hepatitis C infection, HIV infection, and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome, including, at a minimum, information regarding treatment, transmission, and protective measures. (5) If the victim or individual with whom the defendant or child found to be within the provisions of section 2(a)(1) of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.2, engaged in sexual penetration or sexual contact or who was exposed to a body fluid during the course of the crime consents, the court or probate court shall provide the person or agency conducting the examinations or administering the tests under subsection (3) or (4) with the name, address, and telephone number of the victim or individual with whom the defendant or child engaged in sexual penetration or sexual contact or who was exposed to a body fluid of the defendant during the course of the crime. If the victim or individual with whom the defendant or child engaged in sexual penetration during the course of the crime is a minor or otherwise incapacitated, the victim's or individual's parent, guardian, or person in loco parentis may give consent for purposes of this subsection. After the defendant or child is examined or tested as to the presence of sexually transmitted infection, hepatitis B infection, hepatitis C infection, or HIV or an antibody to HIV, or if the defendant or child receives appropriate follow-up testing for the presence of HIV, the person or agency conducting the examinations or administering the tests shall immediately provide the examination or test results to the victim or individual with whom the defendant or child found to be within the provisions of section 2(a)(1) of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.2, engaged in sexual penetration or sexual contact or who was exposed to a body fluid during the course of the crime and shall refer the victim or other individual for appropriate counseling. (6) The examination or test results and any other medical information obtained from the defendant or child found to be within the provisions of section 2(a)(1) of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.2, by the person or agency conducting the examinations or administering the tests under subsection (3) or (4) must be transmitted to the court or probate court and, after the defendant or child is sentenced or an order of disposition is entered, made part of the court record. The examination or test results and any other medical information described in this subsection are confidential and may be disclosed only to 1 or more of the following: (a) The defendant or child. (b) The local health department. (c) The department. (d) The victim or other individual required to be informed of the results under this subsection or subsection (5) or, if the victim or other individual is a minor or otherwise incapacitated, to the victim's or other individual's parent, guardian, or person in loco parentis. (e) Upon written authorization of the defendant or child found to be within the provisions of section 2(a)(1) of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.2, or the child's parent, guardian, or person in loco parentis. (f) As otherwise provided by law. (7) If the defendant is placed in the custody of the department of corrections, the court shall transmit a copy of the defendant's examination and test results and other medical information to the department of corrections. If the child found to be within the provisions of section 2(a)(1) of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.2, is placed by the probate court in the custody of an individual related to the child or a public or private agency, institution, or facility, the probate court shall transmit a copy of the child's examination or test results to the individual related to the child or the director of the agency, institution, or facility. A person or agency that discloses information in compliance with this subsection or subsection (6) is not civilly or criminally liable for making the disclosure. A person or agency that receives test results or other medical information pertaining to HIV infection or acquired immunodeficiency syndrome under this subsection or subsection (6) is subject to section 5131 and shall not disclose the test results or other medical information except as specifically permitted under that section. (8) If an individual receives counseling or is examined or tested under this section and is found to be infected with sexually transmitted infection, hepatitis B, or hepatitis C or to be HIV infected, the individual must be referred by the agency providing the counseling or testing for appropriate medical care. The department, the local health department, or any other agency providing counseling or testing under this section is not financially responsible for medical care received by an individual as a result of a referral made under this subsection. (9) The requirements for the distribution of information concerning sexually transmitted infection, counseling concerning sexually transmitted infection, and examining or testing for sexually transmitted infection under subsections (2), (3), and (4) do not apply to an individual charged with or convicted of violating section 7404 by intravenously using a controlled substance or violating a local ordinance prohibiting the intravenous use of a controlled substance. (10) The court may, upon conviction or the issuance by the probate court of an order adjudicating a child to be within the provisions of section 2(a)(1) of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.2, order an individual who is examined or tested under this section to pay the actual and reasonable costs of that examination or test incurred by the licensed physician or local health department that administered the examination or test. (11) An individual who is ordered to pay the costs of an examination or test under subsection (10) shall pay those costs within 30 days after the order is issued or as otherwise provided by the court. The amount ordered to be paid under subsection (10) must be paid to the clerk of the court, who shall transmit the appropriate amount to the physician or local health department named in the order. If an individual is ordered to pay a combination of fines, costs, restitution, assessments, probation or parole supervision fees, or other payments upon conviction in addition to the costs ordered under subsection (10), the payments must be allocated as provided under the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 710.21 to 712B.41, the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 760.1 to 777.69, and the William Van Regenmorter crime victim's rights act, 1985 PA 87, MCL 780.751 to 780.834. An individual who fails to pay the costs within the 30-day period or as otherwise ordered by the court is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or a fine of not more than $100.00, or both. (12) As used in this section: (a) "Sexual contact" means that term as defined in section 520a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.520a. (b) "Sexual penetration" means that term as defined in section 520a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.520a. (c) "Victim" includes, but is not limited to, a victim as that term is defined in section 520a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.520a. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5016 (request no. H04060'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.